src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_A_mashkimod_gt-norm.yaml
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodenyimishinaanibaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishinaanibaniig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimashkimodenyimishinaanidigan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodenyimishinaanidiging
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishinaanidigag
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimashkimodenyimishiwaabaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodenyimishiwaabaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishiwaabaniig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimashkimodenyimishiwaadigan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodenyimishiwaadiging
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishiwaadigag
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimashkimodensimishinaanibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodensimishinaanibaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodensimishinaanibaniig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimashkimodensimishinaanidigan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodensimishinaanidiging
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodensimishinaanidigag
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimashkimodensimishiwaabaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodensimishiwaabaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodensimishiwaabaniig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimashkimodensimishiwaadigan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodensimishiwaadiging
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodensimishiwaadigag
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: omashkimodenyimishiniibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: omashkimodenyimishiniibaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: omashkimodenyimishiniibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodenyimishiniidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodenyimishiniidiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodenyimishiniidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: omashkimodenyimishiwaabaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omashkimodenyimishiwaabaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omashkimodenyimishiwaabaniig
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodenyimishiwaadigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodenyimishiwaadiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodenyimishiwaadigag
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: omashkimodensimishiniibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: omashkimodensimishiniibaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: omashkimodensimishiniibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodensimishiniidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodensimishiniidiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodensimishiniidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: omashkimodensimishiwaabaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omashkimodensimishiwaabaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omashkimodensimishiwaabaniig
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodensimishiwaadigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodensimishiwaadiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodensimishiwaadigag
     
